Tennessee statutes. Title 16 Courts
Part 9

Service of Process

16-15-901. Issuance and service of civil warrants, writs and other papers.

Upon filing of civil warrants, writs and other papers, the clerk of the general sessions court in which the civil warrants, writs or other papers are filed, shall issue the required process, writs or other papers, and cause it or them, with necessary copies of the civil warrant, writ or papers, to be delivered for service to the person authorized to serve process as may be designated by the party filing the civil warrant, writ or other papers or the party's attorney if represented by counsel. The authorized person shall serve the civil warrant, writ or other papers, and the return endorsed on the warrant, writ or other papers shall be proof of the time and manner of service. A civil warrant, writ or other papers may be issued for service in any county, against any defendant or additional defendants.

A civil warrant, attachment or any other leading process used to initiate an action in general sessions court and subpoenas or summons may be served by any person designated by the party or the party's attorney, if represented by counsel, who is not a party to the action and is not less than eighteen (18) years of age. Service of other process and orders of the courts of this state shall be by sheriffs, constables or as provided by law. If service of process is made by a sheriff, constable, or other law enforcement officer, the process server must be identified by name and agency on the service return or in a supplemental affidavit. If service of process is made by a private process server, the process server must be identified by name and a mailing or physical address on the service return or in a supplemental affidavit. Failure of the process server to include this information does not render the service invalid if the service is otherwise valid, but the court may require a private process server to provide the private process server's mailing or physical address to the party on whom process was served.

Nothing in this section shall affect existing laws with respect to venue.

Acts 2002, ch. 794, § 2; 2019, ch. 196, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former Part 9, §§ 16-15-901 — 16-15-905 (Acts 1995, ch. 205, §§ 2-6), concerning service of process, was repealed by Acts 2002, ch. 794, effective July 1, 2002.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, effective January 1, 2020, in (b), rewrote the third sentence which read, “The process server must be identified by name and address on the return.” and added the last two sentences.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 196, § 2. January 1, 2020.

Attorney General Opinions. A private process server simply designated by a party or the party's attorney may not serve a levy of execution, a summons of garnishment, or any process in connection with a garnishment in aid of execution, OAG 02-079 (7/15/02).

Cited: Yousif v. Clark, 317 S.W.3d 240, 2010 Tenn. App. LEXIS 10 (Tenn. Ct. App. Jan. 13, 2010).

16-15-902. Return.

Any person serving the process from the general sessions court shall promptly and within the time during which the person is served must respond, make proof of service to the court and shall identify the person served and shall describe the manner of service.

Process shall be served within sixty (60) days of issuance.

When process is served by mail, the original warrant, writ or other papers shall be endorsed by manner of service. In addition, an affidavit of the person making service setting forth the personal compliance of this section and the return receipt shall be sent to and filed with the clerk of the court. The person making service in this manner shall endorse over the signature on the original warrant, writ or other papers the date of mailing a certified copy of the warrant, writ or other papers to the defendant and the date of receipt of return receipt from the defendant. If the return receipt is signed by the defendant or any person designated by this section or by statute, service on the defendant is complete. If not, service by mail may be attempted or any other methods authorized by this section or by statute may be used.

Acts 2002, ch. 794, § 2; 2008, ch. 608, § 1.

Cited: Yousif v. Clark, 317 S.W.3d 240, 2010 Tenn. App. LEXIS 10 (Tenn. Ct. App. Jan. 13, 2010).

16-15-903. Service upon defendants in this state.

The plaintiff shall after issuance by the clerk of the general sessions court furnish the persons making the service with all necessary copies. Service shall be made as follows:

Upon an individual other than an unmarried infant incompetent person, by delivering a copy of the warrant, writ or other papers to the individual personally, or if the individual evades or attempts to evade service, by leaving copies of the warrant, writ or other papers at the individual's dwelling house or usual place of abode with some person of suitable age and discretion then residing in the dwelling house or usual place of abode, whose name shall appear on the proof of service, or by delivering the copies to an agent authorized by appointment or by law to receive service on behalf of the individual served;

Upon an unmarried infant or an incompetent person, by delivering a copy of the warrant, writ or other papers to the person's residence guardian or conservator if there is one known to the plaintiff, by delivering the copies to the individual's parent having custody within this state; or if no such parent is within this state, then by delivering the copies to the person within this state having control of the individual. If none of the persons defined and enumerated in this subdivision (2) exists, the court shall appoint a practicing attorney as guardian ad litem to whom the copies shall be delivered. If any of the persons directed by this subdivision (2) to be served is a plaintiff, then the person who is not a plaintiff who stands next in the order named in this subdivision (2) shall be served. In addition to the service provided in this subdivision (2), service shall also be made on an unmarried minor who is fourteen (14) years of age or more and who is not otherwise incompetent;

Upon a partnership or unincorporated association, including a limited liability company, that is named defendant under a common name, by delivering a copy of the warrant, writ or other papers to a partner or managing agent of the partnership, to an officer or managing agent of the association or to an agent authorized by appointment or by law to receive service on behalf of the partnership or association;

Upon a domestic corporation or a foreign corporation doing business in this state, by delivering a copy of the warrant, writ or other papers to an officer or managing agent of the corporation, to the chief agent in the county in which the action is brought, or by delivering the copies to any other agent authorized by appointment or by law to receive service on behalf of the corporation;

Upon a nonresident individual who transacts business through an office or agency in this state, or a resident individual who transacts business through an office or agency in a county other than the county in which the resident individual resides, in any action growing out of or connected with the business of that office or agency, by delivering a copy of the warrant, writ or other papers to the person in charge of the office or agency;

Upon the state of Tennessee or any agency of the state, by delivering a copy of the warrant, writ or other papers to the attorney general of the state or to any assistant attorney general and reporter;

Upon a county, by delivering a copy of the warrant, writ or other papers to the county mayor, or if absent from the county, to the county attorney if there is one designated; if not, by delivering the copies to the county court clerk;

Upon a municipality, by delivering a copy of the warrant, writ or other papers to the chief executive officer or to the city attorney;

Upon any governmental or any quasi-government entity, by delivering a copy of the warrant, writ or other papers to any officer or managing agent of the entity; and

Service by mail of a warrant, writ, or other papers upon a defendant may be made by the plaintiff, the plaintiff's attorney, or by any person authorized by statute. After the complaint, warrant, writ, or other papers are filed, the clerk shall, upon request, furnish the original warrant, writ, or other papers, a certified copy of the original warrant, writ, or other paper, and a copy of the filed warrant, writ, or other papers to the plaintiff, the plaintiff's attorney, or other authorized person for service by mail. Such person shall send, postage prepaid, a certified copy of the warrant, writ, or other papers by registered return receipt or certified return receipt mail to the defendant. The original warrant, writ, or other papers shall be used for return of service of process. Service by mail shall not be the basis for the entry of a judgment by default unless the record contains a return receipt showing personal acceptance by the defendant or by persons designated by this section. If the defendant is a domestic corporation, or a foreign corporation authorized to conduct business in this state, a refusal to accept delivery shall be the basis for a default judgment only where the request for default is accompanied by evidence from the Tennessee secretary of state showing that the moving party made the certified mail service with the correct entity name and the correct name and address for the registered agent authorized by law to receive service of process. If service by mail is unsuccessful, it may be attempted again or other methods authorized by this title or by statute may be used.

Acts 2002, ch. 794, § 2; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2018, ch. 806, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Acts 2018, ch. 806, § 3 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to service of process sent by registered or certified mail on or after July 1, 2018.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment in (10), added the penultimate sentence and inserted commas where they appear preceding “or” throughout the subdivision.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 806, § 3. July 1, 2018.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

16-15-904. Service upon defendants outside of state.

Whenever the law of this state authorizes service outside this state, service, when reasonably calculated to give notice, may be made:

By any form of service authorized within this state pursuant to this part;

In any manner prescribed by the law of the state in which service is effected for an action in any of the courts of general jurisdiction in that state; and

As directed by the court.

This section is inapplicable when service is effected in a place not within any judicial district of the United States.

Service of process pursuant to this section shall include a copy of the warrant, writ or other papers.

Service by mail upon a corporation shall be addressed to an officer or managing agent of the corporation, to the chief agent in the county in which the action is brought or by delivering the copies to any other agent authorized by appointment or by law to receive service on behalf of the corporation.

Service by mail upon a partnership or unincorporated association, included a limited liability company, that is named defendant upon a common name shall be addressed to a partner or managing agent of the partnership or to an officer or managing agent of the association, or to an agent authorized by appointment or by law to receive service on behalf of the partnership or association.

When service of a warrant, writ, or other papers is provided for or permitted by registered or certified mail under the laws of this state, and the addressee, or the addressee's agent, refuses to accept delivery, and it is so stated in the return receipt of the United States postal service, the written return receipt, if returned and filed in the action, shall be deemed an actual and valid service of the warrant, writ, or other papers. Service by mail is complete upon mailing. Service by mail shall not be the basis for the entry of a judgment by default unless the record contains either:

A return receipt showing personal acceptance by the defendant or by persons designated by statute; or

A return receipt stating that the addressee or the addressee's agent refused to accept delivery, which is deemed to be personal acceptance by the defendant pursuant to this subsection (e).

Acts 2002, ch. 794, § 2; 2018, ch. 806, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 806, § 3 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to service of process sent by registered or certified mail on or after July 1, 2018.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment rewrote (e) which read: “When service of warrant, writ or other papers is provided for or permitted by registered or certified mail under the laws of this state, and the addressee, or the addressee's agent, refuses to accept delivery, and it is so stated in the return receipt of the United States postal service, the written return receipt, if returned and filed in the action, shall be deemed an actual and valid service of the warrant, writ or other papers. Service by mail is complete upon mailing. For purposes of this subsection (e), the United States postal service notation that a properly addressed registered or certified letter is ‘unclaimed,’ or other similar notation, is sufficient evidence of the defendant's refusal to accept delivery.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 806, § 3, July 1, 2018.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

16-15-905. Constructive service.

In cases where constructive service of process is permissible under the statutes of this state, constructive service shall be made in the manner prescribed by those statutes, unless otherwise expressly provided in this part.

Acts 2002, ch. 794, § 2.

Parts 10-49

[Reserved]